Utah statutes.
63I-3-201.   Creation -- Members -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Term of office -- Maximum length of service.

(1)  There is created a state commission to be known as the Utah Constitutional Revision Commission, composed of 15 members.

(2) (a)  The speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint three members from the House of Representatives, not more than two of whom may be from the same political party.

(b)  The president of the Senate shall appoint three members from the Senate, not more than two of whom may be from the same political party.

(c)  The governor shall appoint three members, not more than two of whom may be from the same political party.

(3) (a)  The nine members appointed under Subsection (2) shall select six additional members.

(b)  In selecting the six additional members, consideration shall be given to achieving representation from the major geographical areas of the state and to achieving as closely as possible equal bipartisan representation.

(4)  The term for each commission member shall be six years.

(5)  A commission member may not serve on the commission more than 12 consecutive years.

